Maryland, session 2025, HB0326.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–213.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ELIGIBLE FINANCIAL LITERACY COURSE” MEANS A COURSE
THAT PROVIDES INSTRUCTIONAL CONTENT ON FINANCIAL LITERACY CONCEPTS
THAT IS:
(I) OFFERED AT AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0326*

HOUSE BILL 326
(II) OFFERED BY AN ORGANIZATION APPROVED BY THE COUNTY
BOARD; AND
(III) APPROVED BY THE COUNTY BOARD.
(3) “INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 10–101 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) BEGINNING IN THE 2026–2027 SCHOOL YEAR, EACH COUNTY BOARD
SHALL ALLOW SUCCESSFUL COMPLETION OF AN ELIGIBLE FINANCIAL LITERACY
COURSE TO BE APPLIED TOWARD FULFILLMENT OF THE STUDENT SERVICE HOURS
HIGH SCHOOL GRADUATION REQUIREMENT FOR THE NUMBER OF HOURS
DETERMINED BY THE COUNTY BOARD.
(C) THE STATE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.